Tennessee, session 114, SB1156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-1-103(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of food that
contains nanotechnology, unless the food is labeled as containing nanotechnology. As
used in this subdivision (a)( ), "nanotechnology" means human-created structures,
devices, and systems that are designed by manipulating atoms and molecules having
one (1) or more dimensions of the order of one hundred (100) nanometers or less and
that have the capability of collecting and transmitting data;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1156
003144
- 1 -